Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB513.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Pennsylvania State Plane Coordinate System Act.Section 2. Pennsylvania State Plane Coordinate System.(a) System.--The most recent system of plane coordinates based on the National Spatial Reference System, known as the State Plane Coordinate System, which has been established by the National Geodetic Survey or its successors for defining and stating the horizontal and vertical positions or locations of points on the surface of the earth within this Commonwealth, <--<--<--1234567891011121314151617181920 shall be known as the Pennsylvania State Plane Coordinate System.(b) Parameters.--The defining parameters of the Pennsylvania State Plane Coordinate System, including zone definitions, shall be defined and published by the National Geodetic Survey or its successors as a part of the overall State Plane Coordinate System.(c) Geodetic datums.--The official geodetic datums to which geodetic coordinates, including, but not limited to, latitude, longitude, ellipsoid height, orthometric height or dynamic height, are referenced within this Commonwealth shall be as defined for the National Spatial Reference System or its successors and may be accessed via the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration Continuously Operating Reference Stations Network.(d) Previous versions.--Previous versions of the Pennsylvania State Plane Coordinate System shall include the Pennsylvania Coordinate System of 1927 and the Pennsylvania Coordinate System of 1983 as specified by the act of June 2, 1937 (P.L.1208, No.310), entitled "An act to describe, define, and officially adopt a system of coordinates for designating the positions of points on the surface of the earth within the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania."Section 3. Description of Pennsylvania State Plane Coordinate System.The Pennsylvania State Plane Coordinate System, contingent upon zoning provided in the published National Spatial Reference System by the National Geodetic Survey or its successors, may consist of:(1) a single zone layer with full coverage of this 20250HB0513PN3733 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth; and(2) a layer of smaller regional zones, as specified under section 5, that together provide the same coverage as specified under paragraph (1).Section 4. Use of layers and zones.(a) Uses.--The layer specified under section 3(1) is designed for Statewide geospatial datasets. The layer specified under section 3(2) is designed for engineering or surveying projects.(b) Determination.--The determination of which layer and zone to use shall be a user decision based on individual and specific needs.Section 5. Regional zones.For use of the Pennsylvania State Plane Coordinate System, this Commonwealth shall be divided into smaller regional zones as established by the National Geodetic Survey or its successors as specified under section 2(b).Section 6. Coordinates and distances.(a) Coordinates.--The plane coordinates of a point on the surface of the earth, to be used for expressing the geographic position or location of the point in the appropriate zone of the Pennsylvania State Plane Coordinate System, shall consist of two distances expressed in meters and decimals of a meter or International Feet and decimals of a foot.(b) Distances.--(1) One of the distances specified in subsection (a), which shall be known as the "east or x-coordinate," shall give the distance east of the y-axis. The other distance specified under subsection (a), which shall be known as the "north or y-coordinate," shall give the distance north of the 20250HB0513PN3733 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 x-axis.(2) The y-axis of any zone shall be parallel with the central meridian of that zone.(3) The x-axis of any zone shall be at right angles to the central meridian of that zone.(4) An International Foot, which equals 0.3048 meters exactly, shall be used for all foot distances and coordinates unless the distances or coordinates are tied to one of the previous versions of the Pennsylvania State Plane Coordinate System specified under section 2(d).(5) The U.S. Survey Foot, which equals 1200/3937 meters exactly or 0.3048006 meters approximately, shall be superseded by the International Foot as specified under paragraph (4) as determined by the National Institute of Standards and Technology.Section 7. Notation requirements.All of the following shall be named in any land description, plat, map, report of survey or other document in which coordinates based on the Pennsylvania State Plane Coordinate System are used:(1) The Pennsylvania State Plane Coordinate System.(2) The name of the zone, either Statewide or regional, as established by the National Geodetic Survey or its successors in accordance with section 2(b).(3) The source geodetic datum and decimal-year epoch date of the survey or coordinate derivation or calculation.Section 8. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed to prohibit the appropriate use of other datums and other geodetic reference networks.20250HB0513PN3733 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 9. Repeals.The act of June 2, 1937 (P.L.1208, No.310), entitled "An act to describe, define, and officially adopt a system of coordinates for designating the positions of points on the surface of the earth within the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania," is repealed insofar as it is inconsistent with this act.Section 10. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 30 days.SECTION 1. TITLE 76 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED BY ADDING A CHAPTER TO READ:CHAPTER 11PENNSYLVANIA STATE COORDINATE SYSTEMSEC.1101. SYSTEM.1102. DESCRIPTION OF PENNSYLVANIA STATE COORDINATE SYSTEM.1103. USE OF LAYERS AND ZONES.1104. REGIONAL ZONES.1105. COORDINATES AND DISTANCES.1106. NOTATION REQUIREMENTS.1107. CONSTRUCTION.§ 1101. SYSTEM.(A) ESTABLISHMENT.--THE MOST RECENT SYSTEM OF PLANE COORDINATES BASED ON THE NATIONAL SPATIAL REFERENCE SYSTEM, KNOWN AS THE STATE PLANE COORDINATE SYSTEM, WHICH HAS BEEN ESTABLISHED BY THE NATIONAL GEODETIC SURVEY OR ITS SUCCESSORS FOR DEFINING AND STATING THE HORIZONTAL AND VERTICAL POSITIONS OR LOCATIONS OF POINTS ON THE SURFACE OF THE EARTH WITHIN THIS COMMONWEALTH, SHALL BE KNOWN AS THE PENNSYLVANIA STATE COORDINATE SYSTEM.(B) PARAMETERS.--THE DEFINING PARAMETERS OF THE PENNSYLVANIA 20250HB0513PN3733 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STATE COORDINATE SYSTEM, INCLUDING ZONE DEFINITIONS, SHALL BE DEFINED AND PUBLISHED BY THE NATIONAL GEODETIC SURVEY OR ITS SUCCESSORS AS A PART OF THE OVERALL STATE COORDINATE SYSTEM.(C) GEODETIC DATUMS.--THE OFFICIAL GEODETIC DATUMS TO WHICH GEODETIC COORDINATES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, LATITUDE, LONGITUDE, ELLIPSOID HEIGHT, ORTHOMETRIC HEIGHT OR DYNAMIC HEIGHT, ARE REFERENCED WITHIN THIS COMMONWEALTH SHALL BE AS DEFINED FOR THE NATIONAL SPATIAL REFERENCE SYSTEM OR ITS SUCCESSORS AND MAY BE ACCESSED VIA THE NATIONAL OCEANIC AND ATMOSPHERIC ADMINISTRATION CONTINUOUSLY OPERATING REFERENCE STATIONS NETWORK.(D) PREVIOUS VERSIONS.--PREVIOUS VERSIONS OF THE PENNSYLVANIA STATE COORDINATE SYSTEM SHALL INCLUDE THE PENNSYLVANIA COORDINATE SYSTEM OF 1927 AND THE PENNSYLVANIA COORDINATE SYSTEM OF 1983 AS SPECIFIED BY THE ACT OF JUNE 2, 1937 (P.L.1208, NO.310), ENTITLED "AN ACT TO DESCRIBE, DEFINE, AND OFFICIALLY ADOPT A SYSTEM OF COORDINATES FOR DESIGNATING THE POSITIONS OF POINTS ON THE SURFACE OF THE EARTH WITHIN THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA."§ 1102. DESCRIPTION OF PENNSYLVANIA STATE COORDINATE SYSTEM.THE PENNSYLVANIA STATE COORDINATE SYSTEM, CONTINGENT UPON ZONING PROVIDED IN THE PUBLISHED NATIONAL SPATIAL REFERENCE SYSTEM BY THE NATIONAL GEODETIC SURVEY OR ITS SUCCESSORS, MAY CONSIST OF:(1) A SINGLE ZONE LAYER WITH FULL COVERAGE OF THIS COMMONWEALTH; AND(2) A LAYER OF SMALLER REGIONAL ZONES, AS SPECIFIED UNDER SECTION 1104, THAT TOGETHER PROVIDE THE SAME COVERAGE AS SPECIFIED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1).§ 1103. USE OF LAYERS AND ZONES. 20250HB0513PN3733 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) USES.--THE LAYER SPECIFIED UNDER SECTION 1102(1) IS DESIGNED FOR STATEWIDE GEOSPATIAL DATASETS. THE LAYER SPECIFIED UNDER SECTION 1102(2) IS DESIGNED FOR ENGINEERING OR SURVEYING PROJECTS.(B) DETERMINATION.--THE DETERMINATION OF WHICH LAYER AND ZONE TO USE SHALL BE A USER DECISION BASED ON INDIVIDUAL AND SPECIFIC NEEDS.§ 1104. REGIONAL ZONES. FOR USE OF THE PENNSYLVANIA STATE COORDINATE SYSTEM, THIS COMMONWEALTH SHALL BE DIVIDED INTO SMALLER REGIONAL ZONES AS ESTABLISHED BY THE NATIONAL GEODETIC SURVEY OR ITS SUCCESSORS AS SPECIFIED UNDER SECTION 1101(B).§ 1105. COORDINATES AND DISTANCES. (A) COORDINATES.--THE COORDINATES OF A POINT ON THE SURFACE OF THE EARTH, TO BE USED FOR EXPRESSING THE GEOGRAPHIC POSITION OR LOCATION OF THE POINT IN THE APPROPRIATE ZONE OF THE PENNSYLVANIA STATE COORDINATE SYSTEM, SHALL CONSIST OF TWO DISTANCES EXPRESSED IN METERS AND DECIMALS OF A METER OR INTERNATIONAL FEET AND DECIMALS OF A FOOT.(B) DISTANCES.--(1) ONE OF THE DISTANCES SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (A), WHICH SHALL BE KNOWN AS THE "EAST OR X-COORDINATE," SHALL GIVE THE DISTANCE EAST OF THE Y-AXIS. THE OTHER DISTANCE SPECIFIED UNDER SUBSECTION (A), WHICH SHALL BE KNOWN AS THE "NORTH OR Y-COORDINATE," SHALL GIVE THE DISTANCE NORTH OF THE X-AXIS.(2) THE Y-AXIS OF ANY ZONE SHALL BE PARALLEL WITH THE CENTRAL MERIDIAN OF THAT ZONE.(3) THE X-AXIS OF ANY ZONE SHALL BE AT RIGHT ANGLES TO THE CENTRAL MERIDIAN OF THAT ZONE.20250HB0513PN3733 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) AN INTERNATIONAL FOOT, WHICH EQUALS 0.3048 METERS EXACTLY, SHALL BE USED FOR ALL FOOT DISTANCES AND COORDINATES UNLESS THE DISTANCES OR COORDINATES ARE TIED TO ONE OF THE PREVIOUS VERSIONS OF THE PENNSYLVANIA STATE COORDINATE SYSTEM SPECIFIED UNDER SECTION 1101(D).(5) THE U.S. SURVEY FOOT, WHICH EQUALS 1200/3937 METERS EXACTLY OR 0.3048006 METERS APPROXIMATELY, SHALL BE SUPERSEDED BY THE INTERNATIONAL FOOT AS SPECIFIED UNDER PARAGRAPH (4) AS DETERMINED BY THE NATIONAL INSTITUTE OF STANDARDS AND TECHNOLOGY.§ 1106. NOTATION REQUIREMENTS.ALL OF THE FOLLOWING SHALL BE NAMED IN ANY LAND DESCRIPTION, PLAT, MAP, REPORT OF SURVEY OR OTHER DOCUMENT IN WHICH COORDINATES BASED ON THE PENNSYLVANIA STATE COORDINATE SYSTEM ARE USED:(1) THE PENNSYLVANIA STATE COORDINATE SYSTEM.(2) THE NAME OF THE ZONE, EITHER STATEWIDE OR REGIONAL, AS ESTABLISHED BY THE NATIONAL GEODETIC SURVEY OR ITS SUCCESSORS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 1101(B).(3) THE SOURCE GEODETIC DATUM AND DECIMAL-YEAR EPOCH DATE OF THE SURVEY OR COORDINATE DERIVATION OR CALCULATION.§ 1107. CONSTRUCTION.NOTHING IN THIS CHAPTER SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT THE APPROPRIATE USE OF OTHER DATUMS AND OTHER GEODETIC REFERENCE NETWORKS.SECTION 2. REPEALS ARE AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY DECLARES THAT THE REPEAL UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) IS NECESSARY TO EFFECTUATE THE ADDITION OF 76 PA.C.S. CH. 11.(2) THE ACT OF JUNE 2, 1937 (P.L.1208, NO.310), ENTITLED 20250HB0513PN3733 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "AN ACT TO DESCRIBE, DEFINE, AND OFFICIALLY ADOPT A SYSTEM OF COORDINATES FOR DESIGNATING THE POSITIONS OF POINTS ON THE SURFACE OF THE EARTH WITHIN THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA," IS REPEALED INSOFAR AS IT IS INCONSISTENT WITH THE ADDITION OF 76 PA.C.S. CH. 11.SECTION 3. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 30 DAYS.20250HB0513PN3733 - 9 - 123456